Missouri, session 2026, HB2819.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.285, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 144.285, to read as follows:
144.285. 1. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to
collect the amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of
reporting or remitting tax or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of
pennies, the director of revenue shall establish brackets, showing the amounts of tax to be
collected on sales of specified amounts, which shall be applicable to all taxable transactions.
2. In all instances where statements covering taxable purchases are rendered to the
taxpayer on a monthly or other periodic basis, the amount of tax shall be determined by
applying the applicable tax rate to the taxable purchases represented on the statement,
rounded to the nearest whole cent, or by application of the brackets established by the director
of revenue, at the option of the retail vendor.
3. No vendor or seller shall knowingly charge or receive from a purchaser as a sales
tax any sum in excess of the sums provided for in this section.
4. A vendor may, at his option, determine the amount charged to and received from
each purchaser by use of a formula which applies the applicable tax rate to each taxable
purchase, rounded to the nearest whole cent. The formula shall be uniformly and consistently
applied to all purchases similarly situated.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2819 2
5. (1) For cash transactions only, a vendor may round the total amount of sale
due on a transaction to the nearest five cents. Totals ending in $0.01, $0.02, $0.06, or
$0.07 may be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by $0.05. Totals ending in
$0.03, $0.04, $0.08, or $0.09 may be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by $0.05.
Rounding shall be applied only to the final total of the transaction after all items,
discounts, and taxes have been calculated.
(2) This rounding shall not apply to transactions paid by credit, debit, or other
noncash methods. The applicable amount of tax due in accordance with the tax
brackets shall be remitted to the department of revenue regardless of the method of
payment from the taxpayer's customer.
(3) A vendor selling goods or services shall not be in violation of any
requirements, laws, regulations, or standards of a state or political subdivision of this
state based on any action taken in good faith and in compliance with this subsection.
6. Amounts which a vendor charges to and receives from the purchaser in accordance
with this section shall not be includable in his gross receipts if the amounts are separately
charged or stated.
[6.] 7. If sales tax for one or more local political subdivisions is owed by a taxpayer
pursuant to chapter 66, 67, 92, or 94 and that taxpayer remits less than all sales tax due for a
filing period specified in section 144.080, the director of revenue shall deposit the tax
remitted proportionately to each taxing jurisdiction in accordance with the percentage that
each such jurisdiction's share of the tax due for the filing period bears to the total tax due from
such taxpayer for such period. The unpaid balance due along with penalties and interest shall
be similarly prorated among the state and all local jurisdictions for which tax was due during
the filing period for which an underpayment occurs. The provisions of this subsection shall
apply to all returns or remittances relating to sales made on or after January 1, 1984.
✔